District of Columbia statutes.
22-3225.03

Insurance fraud in the second degree.

A person commits the offense of insurance fraud in the second degree if that person knowingly engages in conduct specified in § 22-3225.02 with the intent to defraud or to fraudulently obtain property of another and the value of the property which is sought to be obtained is $1,000 or more.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 125c
as added Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-273, § 2, 46 DCR 1132
July 25, 2006, D.C. Law 16-144, § 2(b), 53 DCR 2838
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 12(c), 58 DCR 1174
This section is referenced in § 16-801 and § 22-3225.04.
1981 Ed., § 22-3825.3.
D.C. Law 16-144 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 18-377 substituted “$1,000” for “$250”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 512(c) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 512(c) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).